Washington statutes.
RCW 10.16.145

Witnesses—Recognizances with sureties.

If the magistrate shall be satisfied that there is good cause to believe that any such witness will not perform the condition of his or her recognizance unless other security be given, such magistrate may order the witness to enter into recognizance with such sureties as may be deemed necessary for his or her appearance at court.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1011; Code 1881 s 1930; 1873 p 396 s 229; 1854 p 108 s 37; RRS s 1960. Formerly codified in RCW 10.16.140, part.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: This section probably superseded by CrR 6.13. See comment after CrR 6.13.